Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3106
Institution of higher education, defined.

Institution of higher education means a university, professional school, or other institution of higher learning that:

(1) In the United States, is accredited by an accrediting organization recognized by the United States Department of Education;

(2) In Canada, holds a membership in the Association of Universities and Colleges of Canada; or

(3) In other countries, is accredited by the respective official organization having such authority.

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 68;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,206.06;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1040;

Laws 2021, LB528, § 11.